Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.304

Transfer of ownership of county-owned vessel—Further requirements.

(1) Following the inspection required under RCW 36.32.302 and prior to transferring ownership of a county-owned vessel, a county shall obtain the following from the transferee:

(a) The purposes for which the transferee intends to use the vessel; and

(b) Information demonstrating the prospective owner's intent to obtain legal moorage following the transfer, in the manner determined by the county.

(2)(a) The county shall remove any containers or other materials that are not fixed to the vessel and contain hazardous substances, as defined under RCW 70A.305.020.

(b) However, the county may transfer a vessel with:

(i) Those containers or materials described under (a) of this subsection where the transferee demonstrates to the county's satisfaction that the container's or material's presence is consistent with the anticipated use of the vessel; and

(ii) A reasonable amount of fuel as determined by the county, based on factors including the vessel's size, condition, and anticipated use of the vessel including initial destination following transfer.

(c) The county may consult with the department of ecology in carrying out the requirements of this subsection.

(3) Prior to sale, and unless the vessel has a title or valid marine document, the county is required to apply for a certificate of title for the vessel under RCW 88.02.510 and register the vessel under RCW 88.02.550.

[ 2020 c 20 s 1020; 2013 c 291 s 20.]